District of Columbia statutes.
34-1403

Certain existing conduits and overhead wires legalized.

All conduits existing on July 7, 1898, within the fire limits, and all overhead electric light wires existing on July 7, 1898, without the fire limits in the District of Columbia are hereby legalized until otherwise provided by law, and house connections may be made with such overhead electric light wires outside such fire limits.

History

July 7, 1898, 30 Stat. 664, ch. 571, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1203.
1973 Ed., § 43-1103.